Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-410 Lines of credit. A credit
union may offer its members self-replenishing lines of credit. Loan advances
within the limits of a line of credit may be made without the necessity of
submitting additional loan applications; provided that the applicant qualifies
for the line of credit and the applicant's aggregate indebtedness under the
line of credit does not exceed the approved limit. The board, credit committee
or credit manager shall review, or cause to be reviewed, all lines of credit at
least once every three years. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next